Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.365

Operating without a license—Penalty.

Any agency operating without a license shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. This section shall not be enforceable against an agency until sixty days after the effective date of new rules, applicable to such agency, have been adopted under this chapter.

[ 2006 c 265 s 315. Formerly RCW 43.215.340.]